California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(8) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to any standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, or guideline established or issued by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this subdivision.

(9) Subdivision (g) of Section 17039 shall not apply to any credit sold pursuant to this subdivision.

(10) For purposes of this subdivision, the unrelated party or parties that purchase a credit pursuant to this subdivision shall be treated as a qualified taxpayer pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(d) No
 credit shall be allowed pursuant to this section unless the qualified taxpayer provides the following to the California Film Commission:

(1) Identification of each qualified individual.

(2) The specific start and end dates of production.

(3) The total wages paid.

(4) The amount of qualified wages paid to each qualified individual.

(5) The copyright registration number, as reflected on the certificate of registration issued under the authority of Section 410 of Title 17 of the United States Code, relating to registration of claim and issuance of certificate. The registration number shall be provided on the return claiming the credit.

(6) The total amounts paid or incurred to purchase or lease tangible personal property used in the production of a qualified motion picture.

(7) Information to substantiate its qualified expenditures.

(8) Information required by the California Film Commission under regulations promulgated pursuant to subdivision (g) necessary to verify the amount of credit claimed.

(e) The California Film Commission may prescribe rules and regulations to carry out the purposes of this section including any rules and regulations necessary to establish procedures, processes, requirements, and rules identified in or required to implement this section. The regulations shall include provisions to set aside a percentage of annual credit allocations for independent films.

(f) If the qualified taxpayer fails to provide the copyright registration number as required in paragraph (5) of subdivision (d), the credit shall be disallowed and assessed and collected under Section 19051 until the procedures are satisfied.

(g) For purposes of this section, the California Film Commission shall do the following:

(1) On or after July 1, 2009, and before July 1, 2017, allocate tax credits to applicants.

(A) Establish a procedure for applicants to file with the California Film Commission a written application, on a form jointly prescribed by the California Film Commission and the Franchise Tax Board for the allocation of the tax credit. The application shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:

(i) The budget for the motion picture production.

(ii) The number of production days.

(iii) A financing plan for the production.

(iv) The diversity of the workforce employed by the applicant, including, but not limited to, the ethnic and racial makeup of the individuals employed by the applicant during the production of the qualified motion picture, to the extent possible.

(v) All members of a combined reporting group, if known at the time of the application.

(vi) Financial information, if available, including, but not limited to, the most recently produced balance sheets, annual statements of profits and losses, audited or
 unaudited financial statements, summary budget projections or results, or the functional equivalent of these documents of a partnership or owner of a single member limited liability company that is disregarded pursuant to Section 23038. The information provided pursuant to this clause shall be confidential and shall not be subject to public disclosure.

(vii) The names of all partners in a partnership not publicly traded or the names of all members of a limited liability company classified as a partnership not publicly traded for California income tax purposes that have a financial interest in the applicant’s qualified motion picture. The information provided pursuant to this clause shall be confidential and shall not be subject to public disclosure.

(viii) Detailed narratives, for use only by the Legislative Analyst’s Office in conducting a study of the effectiveness of this
 credit, that describe the extent to which the credit is expected to influence or affect filming and other business location decisions, hiring decisions, salary decisions, and any other financial matters of the applicant.

(ix) Any other information deemed relevant by the California Film Commission or the Franchise Tax Board.

(B) Establish criteria, consistent with the requirements of this section, for allocating tax credits.

(C) Determine and designate applicants who meet the requirements of this section.

(D) Process and approve, or reject, all applications on a first-come-first-served basis.

(E) Subject to the annual cap established as provided in subdivision (i), allocate an aggregate
 amount of credits under this section and Section 23685, and allocate any carryover of unallocated credits from prior years.

(2) Certify tax credits allocated to qualified taxpayers.

(A) Establish a verification procedure for the amount of qualified expenditures paid or incurred by the applicant, including, but not limited to, updates to the information in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g).

(B) Establish audit requirements that must be satisfied before a credit certificate may be issued by the California Film Commission.

(C) (i) Establish a procedure for a qualified taxpayer to report to the California Film Commission, prior to the issuance of a credit certificate, the following information:

(I) If readily available, a list of the states, provinces, or other jurisdictions in which any member of the applicant’s combined reporting group in the same business unit as the qualified taxpayer that, in the preceding calendar year, has produced a qualified motion picture intended for release in the United States market. For purposes of this clause, “qualified motion picture” shall not include any episodes of a television series that were complete or in production prior to July 1, 2009.

(II) Whether a qualified motion picture described in subclause (I) was awarded any financial incentive by the state, province, or other jurisdiction that was predicated on the performance of primary principal photography or postproduction in that location.

(ii) The California Film Commission may provide that the report required by
 this subparagraph be filed in a single report provided on a calendar year basis for those qualified taxpayers that receive multiple credit certificates in a calendar year.

(D) Issue a credit certificate to a qualified taxpayer upon completion of the qualified motion picture reflecting the credit amount allocated after qualified expenditures have been verified under this section. The amount of credit shown in the credit certificate shall not exceed the amount of credit allocated to that qualified taxpayer pursuant to this section.

(3) Obtain, when possible, the following information from applicants that do not receive an allocation of credit:

(A) Whether the qualified motion picture that was the subject of the application was completed.

(B) If completed,
 in which state or foreign jurisdiction was the primary principal photography completed.

(C) Whether the applicant received any financial incentives from the state or foreign jurisdiction to make the qualified motion picture in that location.

(4) Provide the Legislative Analyst’s Office, upon request, any or all application materials or any other materials received from, or submitted by, the applicants, in electronic format when available, including, but not limited to, information provided pursuant to clauses (i) to (ix), inclusive, of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1).

(5) The information provided to the California Film Commission pursuant to this section shall constitute confidential tax information for purposes of Article 2 (commencing with Section 19542) of Chapter 7 of Part 10.2. 

(h) (1) The California Film Commission shall annually provide the Legislative Analyst’s Office, the Franchise Tax Board, and the board with a list of qualified taxpayers and the tax credit amounts allocated to each qualified taxpayer by the California Film Commission. The list shall include the names and taxpayer identification numbers, including taxpayer identification numbers of each partner or shareholder, as applicable, of the qualified taxpayer.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (5) of subdivision (g), the California Film Commission shall annually post on its Internet Web site and make available for public release the following:

(i) A table which includes all of the following information: a list of qualified taxpayers and the tax credit amounts allocated to each qualified
 taxpayer by the California Film Commission, the number of production days in California the qualified taxpayer represented in its application would occur, the number of California jobs that the qualified taxpayer represented in its application would be directly created by the production, and the total amount of qualified expenditures expected to be spent by the production.

(ii) A narrative staff summary describing the production of the qualified taxpayer as well as background information regarding the qualified taxpayer contained in the qualified taxpayer’s application for the credit.

(B) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to make the information submitted by an applicant for a tax credit under this section a public record. 

(i) (1) The aggregate amount of credits that may be
 allocated in any fiscal year pursuant to this section and Section 23685 shall be an amount equal to the sum of all of the following:

(A) One hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) in credits for the 2009–10 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, through and including the 2016–17 fiscal year.

(B) The unused allocation credit amount, if any, for the preceding fiscal year.

(C) The amount of previously allocated credits not certified.

(2) If the amount of credits applied for in any particular fiscal year exceeds the aggregate amount of tax credits authorized to be allocated under this section, such excess shall be treated as having been applied for on the first day of the subsequent fiscal year. However, credits may not be allocated from a fiscal year
 other than the fiscal year in which the credit was originally applied for or the immediately succeeding fiscal year.

(3) Notwithstanding the foregoing, the California Film Commission shall set aside up to ten million dollars ($10,000,000) of tax credits each fiscal year for independent films allocated in accordance with rules and regulations developed pursuant to subdivision (e).

(4) Any act that reduces the amount that may be allocated pursuant to paragraph (1) constitutes a change in state taxes for the purpose of increasing revenues within the meaning of Section 3 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution and may be passed by not less than two-thirds of all Members elected to each of the two houses of the Legislature.

(j) The California Film Commission shall have the authority to
 allocate tax credits in accordance with this section and in accordance with any regulations prescribed pursuant to subdivision (e) upon adoption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 841, Sec. 2.   (AB 2026)   Effective September 30, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

17053.87.

(a) For the taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2017, and before January 1, 2028, there shall be allowed as a credit against the “net tax,” as defined in Section 17039, an amount equal to 50 percent of the amount contributed by the taxpayer for the taxable year to the College Access Tax Credit Fund, as allocated and certified by the California Educational Facilities Authority.

(b) (1) The aggregate amount of credit that may be allocated and certified pursuant to this section, Section 12207, and Section 23687 shall be an amount equal to five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000).

(2) (A) For the purposes of this section, the California
 Educational Facilities Authority shall do all of the following:

(i) On a first-come-first-served basis, allocate and certify tax credits to taxpayers under this section.

(ii) Establish a procedure for taxpayers to contribute to the College Access Tax Credit Fund and to obtain from the California Educational Facilities Authority a certification for the credit allowed by this section. The procedure shall require the California Educational Facilities Authority to certify the contribution amount eligible for credit within 45 days following receipt of the contribution.

(iii) Provide to the Franchise Tax Board a copy of each credit certificate issued for the calendar year by March 1 of the calendar year immediately following the year in which those certificates are issued.

(B) (i) The California Educational Facilities Authority shall adopt any regulations necessary or appropriate to implement this paragraph.

(ii) The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) shall not apply to any regulation adopted by the California Educational Facilities Authority pursuant to clause (i).

(c) (1) In the case where the credit allowed by this section exceeds the “net tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “net tax” in the following year, and succeeding five years if necessary, until the credit is exhausted.

(2) A deduction shall not be allowed under this part for amounts taken into account under this
 section in calculating the credit allowed by this section.

(d) (1) The College Access Tax Credit Fund is hereby created as a special fund in the State Treasury. All revenue in this special fund shall be allocated as follows:

(A) First to the General Fund in an amount equal to the aggregate amount of certified credits allowed pursuant to this section and Section 23687 for the taxable year. Funds allocated to the General Fund shall be considered General Fund revenues for purposes of Sections 8 and 8.5 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(B) Second, upon appropriation, to the Department of Insurance, the Franchise Tax Board, the California Educational Facilities Authority, the Controller, and the Student Aid Commission for reimbursement of all administrative costs incurred by those
 agencies in connection with their duties under this section, Section 12207, Section 23687, and Section 69431.7 of the Education Code.

(C) Third, upon appropriation, to the California Educational Facilities Authority for outreach purposes to inform taxpayers about the College Access Tax Credit Fund and the credits allowed by this section, Section 12207, and Section 23687.

(D) Fourth, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the remaining revenue shall be continuously appropriated to the Student Aid Commission for purposes of awarding students pursuant to Article 16 (commencing with Section 69840) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code.

(2) The tax credit allowed by subdivision (a), subdivision (a) of Section 12207, and subdivision (a) of Section 23687 for donations to the
 College Access Tax Credit Fund shall be known as the College Access Tax Credit.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 278, Sec. 4.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of December 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17053.88.5.

(a) In the case of a qualified taxpayer who donates qualified donation items to a food bank located in California under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 58501) of Part 1 of Division 21 of the Food and Agricultural Code, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2017, and before January 1, 2027, there shall be allowed as a credit against the “net tax,” defined by Section 17039, an amount equal to 15 percent of the qualified value of those qualified donation items.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Qualified donation item” means fresh fruits or fresh vegetables and the following raw agricultural products or processed foods:

(A) All of the following:

(i) “Fruits, nuts, or vegetables” as defined in Section 42510 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(ii) “Meat food product” as defined in Section 18665 of the
 Food and Agricultural Code.

(iii) “Poultry” as defined in Section 18675 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(iv) “Eggs” as defined in Section 75027 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(v) “Fish” as defined in Section 58609 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(B) All of the following food as defined in Section 109935 of the Health and Safety Code:

(i) Rice.

(ii) Beans.

(iii) Fruits, nuts, and vegetables in canned, frozen, dried, dehydrated, and 100 percent juice forms.

(iv) Any cheese, milk, yogurt,
 butter, and dehydrated milk meeting the requirements in Division 15 (commencing with Section 32501) of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(v) Infant formula subject to Section 114094.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(vi) Vegetable oil and olive oil.

(vii) Soup, pasta sauce, and salsa.

(viii) Bread and pasta.

(ix) Canned meats and canned seafood.

(2) (A) “Qualified taxpayer” means the person responsible for planting a crop, managing the crop, and harvesting the crop from the land.

(B) (i) “Qualified taxpayer” also means
 the person responsible for growing or raising a qualified donation item, or harvesting, packing, or processing a qualified donation item, provided that person is not a retailer.

(ii) As used in this subparagraph, “retailer” means a person primarily engaged in the business of making retail sales directly to the public.

(3) (A) “Qualified value” shall be calculated by using the weighted average wholesale price based on the qualified taxpayer’s total like grade wholesale sales of the donated item sold within the calendar month of the qualified taxpayer’s donation.

(B) If no wholesale sales of the donated item have occurred in the calendar month of the qualified taxpayer’s donation, the “qualified value” shall be equal to the nearest regional wholesale market price for the calendar month of the
 donation based upon the same grade products as published by the United States Department of Agriculture’s Agricultural Marketing Service or its successor.

(c) If the credit allowed by this section is claimed by the qualified taxpayer, any deduction otherwise allowed under this part for that amount of the cost paid or incurred by the qualified taxpayer that is eligible for the credit shall be reduced by the amount of the credit provided in subdivision (a).

(d) The qualified taxpayer shall provide to the food bank the qualified value of the qualified donation items and information regarding the origin of where the qualified donation items were grown, processed, or both grown and processed. Upon receipt of the qualified donation items, the food bank shall provide a certificate to the qualified taxpayer. The certificate shall contain a statement signed and dated by a person authorized
 by that food bank that the item is donated under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 58501) of Part 1 of Division 21 of the Food and Agricultural Code. The certificate shall also contain the type and quantity of items donated, the name of the qualified taxpayer or qualified taxpayers, the name and address of the food bank, and, as provided by the qualified taxpayer, the qualified value of the qualified donation items and their origins. Upon the request of the Franchise Tax Board, the qualified taxpayer shall provide a copy of the certification to the Franchise Tax Board.

(e) The credit allowed by this section may be claimed only on a timely filed original return.

(f) In the case where the credit allowed by this section exceeds the “net tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “net tax” in the following year, and for the six succeeding years if necessary, until the credit
 has been exhausted.

(g) In accordance with Section 41, the purpose of the credit is to increase donations to food banks. Using the information available to the Franchise Tax Board from the certificates required under subdivision (d) and subdivision (d) of Section 23688.5, the Franchise Tax Board shall report to the Legislature on or before December 1, 2019, and each December 1 thereafter until the inoperative date specified in subdivision (h), regarding the utilization of the credit authorized by this section and Section 23688.5. The Franchise Tax Board shall also include in the report the qualified value of the qualified donation items, the county in which the qualified donation items originated, and the month the donation was made.

(h) (1) A report required to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (g) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the
 Government Code.

(2) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under subdivision (g) is inoperative on January 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(i) This section shall be repealed on December 1, 2027.

(j) The amendments made to this section by Chapter 431 of the Statutes of 2019 shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 82, Sec. 10.   (AB 150)   Effective July 16, 2021.   Repealed as of December 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17053.91.

For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2027, there shall be allowed to a taxpayer that receives a tax credit allocation a credit against the “net tax,” as defined in Section 17039, in an amount determined in accordance with Section 47 of the Internal Revenue Code, except as otherwise provided in this section.

(a) (1) In lieu of the amount of credit computed pursuant to Section 47(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, the amount of credit for the taxable year shall be 20 percent of the qualified rehabilitation expenditures with respect to a certified historic structure.

(2) The applicable percentage shall be 25 percent of the qualified rehabilitation expenditures with respect to a certified historic structure if that certified historic structure meets one of the following criteria:

(A) The structure is located on federal surplus property, if obtained by a local agency under Section 54142 of the Government Code, on surplus state real property, as defined by Section 11011.1 of the Government Code, or on surplus land, as defined by subdivision (b) of Section 54221 of the Government Code.

(B) The rehabilitated structure includes affordable housing for lower income households, as defined by Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(C) The structure is located in a
 designated census tract, as defined in paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 17053.73.

(D) The rehabilitated structure is a part of a military base reuse authority established pursuant to Title 7.86 (commencing with Section 67800) of the Government Code.

(E) The structure is a transit-oriented development that is a higher density, mixed-use development within a walking distance of one-half mile of a transit station.

(3) (A) The credit shall be allowed for qualified rehabilitation expenditures for a qualified residence determined by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee and the Office of Historic Preservation to rehabilitate the historic character and improve the integrity of the residence
 in the year of completion in the percentages specified in paragraphs (1) and (2), as applicable, except that the credit shall only be allowed in an amount equal to or more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) but not exceeding twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). A taxpayer shall only be allowed a credit pursuant to this paragraph once every 10 taxable years.

(B) Section 47(c)(1)(B)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rule for phased rehabilitation, shall not apply.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Certified historic structure” has the same meaning as defined in Section 47(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, that is a structure in this state and is
 listed on the California Register of Historical Resources.

(2) “Qualified residence” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 163(h)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code, that will be owned and occupied by an individual taxpayer who has a modified adjusted gross income, as defined by Section 86(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) or less, as the taxpayer’s principal residence or what will be the taxpayer’s principal residence within two years after the rehabilitation of the residence.

(3) (A) “Qualified rehabilitation expenditure” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 47(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, except that qualified rehabilitation expenditures may include expenditures in
 connection with the rehabilitation of a building without regard to whether any portion of the building is or is reasonably expected to be tax-exempt use property.

(B) “Qualified rehabilitation expenditure” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 47(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code and also means rehabilitation expenditures incurred by the taxpayer with respect to a qualified residence for the rehabilitation of the exterior of the building or rehabilitation necessary for the functioning of the home, including, but not limited to, rehabilitation of the electrical, plumbing, or foundation of the qualified residence.

(C) The amendments made by Section 13402(b)(1)(B) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97) to Section 47(c)(2)(B)(iv) of the Internal Revenue Code,
 relating to certified historic structure, shall not apply. 

(c) (1) To be eligible for the credit allowed by this section, a taxpayer shall request a tax credit allocation from the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee, in conjunction with the Office of Historic Preservation.

(2) To obtain a tax credit allocation, the taxpayer shall provide necessary information, as determined by the Office of Historic Preservation and the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee.

(3) A tax credit allocation provided to a taxpayer shall not constitute a determination by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee with respect to any of the requirements of this section regarding a taxpayer’s eligibility for
 the credit authorized by this section.

(4) The Office of Historic Preservation shall establish in regulations the time period that a taxpayer who receives a tax credit allocation must commence rehabilitation after the issuance of the tax credit allocation. If rehabilitation is not commenced within the time period established by the office, the tax credit allocation shall be forfeited and the credit amount associated with the tax credit allocation shall be treated as an unused allocation tax credit amount.

(d) A deduction shall not be allowed under this part for any expense for which a credit for that expense is allowed by this section.

(e) If a credit is allowed under this section with respect to any property,
 the basis of that property shall be reduced by the amount of the credit allowed.

(f) (1) A credit allowed under this section shall be claimed in the first taxable year in which the structure is placed in service.

(2) In the case where the credit allowed by this section exceeds the “net tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “net tax” in the following year, and the seven succeeding years, if necessary, until the credit is exhausted.

(g) For purposes of this section, the Office of Historic Preservation shall do all of the following:

(1) Adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this section. The regulations shall comply with the
 requirements of the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(2) Establish a written application, on a form jointly prescribed by the office and the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee, for the allocation of the tax credit. The written application shall require the applicant to include a summary of the expected economic benefits of the project. The economic benefits shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The number of jobs created by the rehabilitation project, both during and after the rehabilitation of the structure.

(B) The expected increase in state and local tax
 revenues derived from the rehabilitation project, including those from increased wages and property taxes.

(C) Any additional incentives or contributions included in the rehabilitation project from federal, state, or local governments.

(D) For the qualified rehabilitation expenditures with respect to a qualified residence, the rehabilitation has a public benefit, as determined jointly with the Office of Historic Preservation.

(3) Establish a process to determine that applicants meet the requirements of this section and to ensure that the rehabilitation project meets the Secretary of the Interior’s Standards for Rehabilitation, as found in Part 67 of Title 36 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(4) Establish a process to approve, or reject, all tax credit allocation applications.

(h) For purposes of this section, the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee shall do all of the following:

(1) Establish a process jointly with the Office of Historic Preservation to implement the provisions of this section.

(2) (A) Subject to the annual cap established as provided in subdivision (i), allocate on a first-come-first-served basis an aggregate amount of credits under this section and Section 23691, and allocate any carryover of unallocated credits from prior years.

(B) A taxpayer
 shall be allocated a tax credit pursuant to the taxpayer’s tax credit allocation upon receipt by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee of a cost certification for the qualified rehabilitation expenditures. For projects with qualified rehabilitation expenditures in excess of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), the cost certification shall be issued by a licensed certified public accountant.

(3) Certify tax credits allocated to taxpayers.

(4) Provide the Franchise Tax Board an annual list of the taxpayers that were allocated a credit pursuant to this section and Section 23691, including each taxpayer’s taxpayer identification number, and the amount allocated to each taxpayer.

(5) Establish procedures for
 the recapture of amounts allocated for a tax credit allowed to a taxpayer for the rehabilitation of a qualified residence if the taxpayer does not use the qualified residence as their principal residence within two years after the rehabilitation of the residence.

(i) (1) The aggregate amount of credits that may be allocated in any calendar year pursuant to this section and Section 23691 shall be an amount equal to the sum of all of the following:

(A) Fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) in tax credits for the 2021 calendar year and each calendar year thereafter, through and including the 2027 calendar year.

(B) The unused allocation tax credit amount, if any, for the preceding calendar year.

(2) Notwithstanding the foregoing, the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee shall set aside ten million dollars ($10,000,000) of tax credits that may be allocated each calendar year for taxpayers in the aggregate, pursuant to this paragraph and paragraph (2) of subdivision (i) of Section 23691, as follows:

(A) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) of tax credits, in the aggregate, for taxpayers with qualified rehabilitation expenditures for a certified historic structure that is a qualified residence. After providing for the reallocation pursuant to subparagraph (C), to the extent that this amount is not fully allocated in any calendar year, the unused portion shall become available in subsequent calendar years for allocation to other taxpayers with qualified rehabilitation expenditures
 for a certified historic structure that is a qualified residence.

(B) Eight million dollars ($8,000,000) of tax credits, in the aggregate, for taxpayers with qualified rehabilitation expenditures of less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) for any other certified historic building that is not a qualified residence. After providing for the reallocation pursuant to subparagraph (C), to the extent that this amount is not fully allocated in any calendar year, the unused portion shall become available in subsequent calendar years for allocation to other taxpayers, except those taxpayers subject to subparagraph (A).

(C) Beginning July 1, 2025, any unused allocation set aside in subparagraphs (A) and (B) for the 2025 calendar year shall be made available within 90 days to taxpayers
 with qualified rehabilitation expenditures of one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more that submitted applications in that same calendar year and did not receive any allocation, are eligible to receive an allocation, and would have been the next affordable housing project application to receive an award.

(j) In the case of any application for tax credits by an entity treated as a partnership for income tax purposes:

(1) Credits awarded to a partnership shall be allocated to the partners of that partnership in accordance with the partnership agreement, regardless of how the federal historic rehabilitation tax credit with respect to the project is allocated to the partners, or whether the allocation of the credit under the terms of the partnership agreement has substantial
 economic effect, within the meaning of Section 704(b) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) To the extent the allocation of the credit to a partner under this section lacks substantial economic effect, any loss or deduction otherwise allowable under this part that is attributable to the sale or other disposition of that partner’s partnership interest made prior to the expiration of the tax credit recapture period for the project described in paragraph (1) shall not be allowed in the taxable year in which the sale or other disposition occurs, but shall instead be deferred until, and treated as if, it occurred in the first taxable year immediately following the taxable year in which the tax credit recapture period expires for the project described in paragraph (1). The credits awarded to a partnership shall be allocated to the partners of that
 partnership in accordance with the partnership agreement.

(k) For purposes of this section, the provisions of subsection (a) of Section 50 of the Internal Revenue Code shall apply.

(l) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, a credit allowed pursuant to this section may reduce the tax imposed under Section 17041 or 17048 plus the tax imposed under Section 17504, relating to the separate tax on lump-sum distributions, below the tentative minimum tax.

(m) This section shall remain in effect regardless of the expiration or repeal of Section 47 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to rehabilitation credit.

(n) The California Tax Credit Allocation
 Committee and the Office of Historic Preservation may charge a reasonable fee in an amount that does not exceed the reasonable costs incurred by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee and the Office of Historic Preservation in fulfilling the responsibilities described in paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (g) and subdivision (h) and paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (g) and subdivision (h) of Section 23691.

(o) (1) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(2) Unless otherwise specified in any bill providing for appropriations related to the Budget Act, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2027, the amount of credit allowed pursuant to this
 section shall be zero dollars ($0).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 4.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.   Repealed as of December 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17053.95.

(a) (1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2016, there shall be allowed to a qualified taxpayer a credit against the “net tax,” as defined in Section 17039, subject to a computation and ranking by the California Film Commission in subdivision (g) and the allocation amount categories described in subdivision (i), in an amount equal to 20 percent or 25 percent, whichever is the applicable credit percentage described in paragraph (4), of the qualified expenditures for the production of a qualified motion picture in California. A credit shall not be allowed under this section for any qualified expenditures for the production of a motion picture in California if a credit has been claimed for those same expenditures under Section 17053.85.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the credit shall be allowed for the taxable year in which the California Film Commission issues the credit certificate pursuant to subdivision (g) for the qualified motion picture, but in no instance prior to July 1, 2016, and shall be for the applicable percentage of all qualified expenditures paid or incurred by the qualified taxpayer in all taxable years for that qualified motion picture.

(3) The amount of the credit allowed to a qualified taxpayer shall be limited to the amount specified in the credit certificate issued to the qualified taxpayer by the California Film Commission pursuant to subdivision (g).

(4) For purposes of paragraphs (1) and (2), the applicable credit percentage shall be:

(A) Twenty percent of the qualified expenditures
 attributable to the production of a qualified motion picture in California, including, but not limited to, a feature, up to one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) in qualified expenditures, or a television series that relocated to California that is in its second or subsequent years of receiving a tax credit allocation pursuant to this section or Section 17053.85.

(B) Twenty-five percent of the qualified expenditures attributable to the production of a qualified motion picture in California where the qualified motion picture is a television series that relocated to California in its first year of receiving a tax credit allocation pursuant to this section.

(C) Twenty-five percent of the qualified expenditures, up to ten million dollars ($10,000,000), attributable to the production of a qualified motion picture that is an independent film.

(D) Additional credits shall be allowed to a qualified motion picture whose applicable credit percentage is determined pursuant to subparagraph (A), in an aggregate amount not to exceed 5 percent of the qualified expenditures under that subparagraph, as follows:

(i) (I) Five percent of qualified expenditures relating to original photography outside the Los Angeles zone.

(II) For purposes of this clause:

(ia) “Applicable period” means the period that commences with preproduction and ends when original photography concludes. The applicable period includes the time necessary to strike a remote location and return to the Los Angeles zone.

(ib) “Los Angeles zone” means the